Utah statutes.
73-15-6.   Cloud-seeding contractors -- Registration.

Any individual or organization that would like to become a cloud-seeding contractor in the state of Utah shall register with the Division of Water Resources. As a part of the registration the applicant shall meet qualifications established by the Division of Water Resources and submit proof of financial responsibility in order to give reasonable assurance of protection to the public in the event it should be established that damages were caused to third parties as a result of negligence in carrying out a cloud-seeding project.



Enacted by Chapter 193, 1973 General Session

